Utah statutes.
46-1-17.   Obtaining a seal.
(1)  A vendor may not provide a notarial seal, either inking or embossing, to
a person claiming to be a notary, unless the person presents a photocopy of
the person's notarial commission, attached to a notarized declaration
substantially as follows:
Application for Notary Seal
I, __________________ (name of person requesting seal), declare that I am a
notary public duly commissioned by the state of Utah with a commission
starting date of __________, a commission expiration date of_______________,
and a commission number of ___________.  As evidence, I attach to this paper a
photocopy of my commission.
(2)  A vendor who provides a notarial seal in violation of this section is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
